Washington statutes.
RCW 9.86.020

Improper use of flag prohibited.

(1) No person shall, in any manner, for exhibition or display:

(a) Place or cause to be placed any word, figure, mark, picture, design, drawing or advertisement of any nature upon any flag, standard, color, ensign or shield of the United States or of this state, or authorized by any law of the United States or of this state; or

(b) Expose to public view any such flag, standard, color, ensign or shield upon which shall have been printed, painted or otherwise produced, or to which shall have been attached, appended, affixed or annexed any such word, figure, mark, picture, design, drawing or advertisement; or

(c) Expose to public view for sale, manufacture, or otherwise, or to sell, give, or have in possession for sale, for gift or for use for any purpose, any substance, being an article of merchandise, or receptacle, or thing for holding or carrying merchandise, upon or to which shall have been produced or attached any such flag, standard, color, ensign or shield, in order to advertise, call attention to, decorate, mark or distinguish such article or substance.

(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 47; 1919 c 107 s 2; 1909 c 249 s 423; 1901 c 154 s 1; RRS s 2675-2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.